New York, session 2025-2026, A599.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 17 of section 265.00 of the penal law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to read as follows: 3 (d) an offense which would constitute a felony offense against an 4 animal pursuant to section three hundred fifty-one, three hundred 5 fifty-three-a, three hundred sixty, or three hundred sixty-one of the 6 agriculture and markets law or section 242.15 of this part. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 8 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02429-01-5